Ohio, session 136, SB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.926 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5534.926. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 6
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northeastbound and 7
southwestbound lanes of state route number ten between west 8
forty-seventh street and west fiftieth street, in the municipal 9
corporation of Cleveland in Cuyahoga county, shall be known as 10
the "John E. Gallagher Way." 11
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 12
along the highway indicating its name. 13